Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-915
Health and safety of employees; rules and regulations.

The Department of Labor is hereby authorized to promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations after due notice and hearing for the safety, sanitation, shelter, and health of railroad maintenance-of-way employees, as far as shelter and drinking water for human consumption pertain to the railroad maintenance-of-way employees.

Laws 1955, c. 189, § 1, p. 537;

Laws 1969, c. 600, § 1, p. 2455.